Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB218.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13 of the act of May 28, 1937 (P.L.955, No.265), referred to as the Housing Authorities Law, is amended 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 to read:Section 13. Establishment of Rentals and Selection of Tenants.--Subject to the preferences under section 13.2, an Authority may rent or lease dwelling accommodations only to persons of low income and at rentals within their financial reach. It may rent or lease to a tenant a dwelling consisting of the number of rooms (but no greater number) which it deems necessary to provide safe and sanitary accommodations to the proposed occupants thereof without overcrowding. It shall not accept any person as a tenant in any housing project if the person or persons, who would occupy the dwelling, have an aggregate annual income in excess of six times the annual rental of the quarters to be furnished such person or persons. In computing rental for the purpose of selecting tenants, there shall be included in the rental the average annual cost, as determined by the Authority, to the occupants of heat, water, electricity, gas, cooking range, and other necessary services or facilities, whether or not the charge for such services and facilities is in fact included in the rental. An Authority may not rent or lease dwelling accommodations to a person who is not a citizen of the United States or any person who is present in this Commonwealth or the United States in violation of 8 U.S.C. Ch. 12 (relating to immigration and nationality). Every Authority shall file a schedule of its rental charges for dwelling accommodations with the State Planning Board.Nothing contained in this or the preceding section shall be construed as limiting the power of an Authority to vest in an obligee the right, in the event of a default by the Authority, to take possession of a housing project, or cause the appointment of a receiver thereof, or acquire title thereto 20250SB0218PN0167 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 through foreclosure proceedings, free from all the restrictions imposed by this or the preceding section.Section 2. Section 13.2 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 13.2. Veteran Preferences.--* * *(b.1) The preference established by this section shall apply to all programs offered by the authority for which the recipient of the preference qualifies.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0218PN0167 - 3 - 12345678910